Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
State Opera

153.510.
Designation of Kentucky state opera.

The Kentucky Opera Association of Louisville is hereby designated and declared to be the state opera of Kentucky, with the right to adopt for itself or for any wholly owned subsidiary the title “Kentucky State Opera.” The state opera, so designated and declared, may create an educational department to increase knowledge and understanding of opera among people throughout the Commonwealth, present public performances throughout the Commonwealth, help in tourist promotion, be available to work with Kentucky colleges and universities in conjunction with accredited programs, and expand its activities through touring and other means to enhance the reputation of the Commonwealth as a major area of arts activity in the United States and throughout the world.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 404, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.